Utah statutes.
35A-8-1002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Community action agency" means a local subdivision of the state, a combination of political subdivisions, a separate public agency, or a private nonprofit agency, which:

(a)  has the authority under its applicable charter or laws to receive funds to support community action activities and other appropriate measures designed to identify and deal with the causes of poverty in the state; and

(b)  is designated as a community action agency by federal law, federal regulations, or the governor.

(2)  "Community action program budget" means state funds, federal block grants, and federal categorical grants that are received by the state for community action activities.

(3)  "Community action statewide organization" means community action programs, organized on a statewide basis, to enhance the capability of community action agencies.

(4)  "Community Services Block Grant" means the Federal Community Services Block Grant Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9901 et seq., and any corresponding federal regulations.

(5)  "Local share" means cash or in-kind goods and services donated to a community action agency to carry out its responsibilities.

(6)  "Low-income person" means a person who is a member of a household with a gross annual income equal to or less than 125% of the poverty standard accepted by the federal agency designated to establish poverty guidelines.

(7)  "Office" means the State Community Services Office created in Section 35A-8-1003.

(8)  "Service area" means the geographical area within the jurisdiction of a community action agency or a community action statewide organization.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

